Georgia, session 2025_26, HB610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 44 of Title 36 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to redevelopment
powers, is amended by revising Code Section 36-44-21, relating to public employees and
officials prohibited from holding interest disclosures, voidability of prohibited transactions,
and misconduct in office, as follows:
"36-44-21.
(a) No elected or appointed official or employee of a political subdivision or a board,
commission, or redevelopment agency thereof shall voluntarily acquire any interest, direct
or indirect, in any property included or planned to be included in a redevelopment area, or
in any contract or transaction or proposed contract or transaction in connection with the
redevelopment of that redevelopment area. Where such acquisition is not voluntary, the
H. B. 610
- 1 -

LC 44 2997
interest acquired shall be immediately disclosed without immediately disclosing such
interest in writing to the local legislative body and such disclosure shall be entered upon
the minutes of the local legislative body. Any such elected or appointed official or
employee who, within two years immediately prior to the date the plan is submitted to a
local legislative body under subsection (b) of Code Section 36-44-7, acquires ownership
or control of any interest, direct or indirect, in any property which is included in the
redevelopment area designated in that plan and who retains that ownership or control at the
time that such plan is so submitted shall, at least 30 days prior to the date scheduled for the
local legislative body to adopt the plan, disclose the interest in writing to the local
legislative body and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the local
legislative body, and that person shall not participate in any action by the political
subdivision, board, commission, or redevelopment agency thereof which affects that
property. Any disclosure required to be made by this subsection shall concurrently be
made to the redevelopment agency.
(b) Any contract or transaction in violation of subsection (a) of this Code section or the
disclosure of which is not made as provided in that subsection (a) of this Code section shall
be voidable by the local legislative body. This subsection shall not apply to any indenture,
agreement, contract, or transaction which constitutes security, direct or indirect, for
payment of bonds or other obligations incurred pursuant to a redevelopment plan, and the
judgment and order confirming and validating any such bonds or other obligations shall
constitute a final and conclusive adjudication as to any such security.
(c) Failure by an official or employee to comply with subsection (a) of this Code section
shall constitute misconduct in office."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 610
- 2 -